Florida, session 2026, SB622.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 947.148, Florida Statutes, is created to 28 read: 29 947.148âConditional geriatric release.â 30 (1)âThe commission shall, in conjunction with the 31 department, establish the conditional geriatric release program. 32 A person in the departmentâs custody is eligible for 33 consideration for release under the conditional geriatric 34 release program when he or she is 65 years of age or older, has 35 served a minimum of 15 years of his or her sentence in the 36 departmentâs custody, and is not under a sentence of death. 37 (2)âNotwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a person 38 sentenced to the custody of the department may apply to the 39 commission to be considered for conditional geriatric release up 40 to 2 years before reaching eligibility. The commission may grant 41 a request for conditional geriatric release before the person 42 reaches eligibility status, but a person may not be released 43 until the date he or she becomes eligible. 44 (3)âA person does not have a right to conditional geriatric 45 release. 46 (4)âIn determining whether to grant release under this 47 section, the commission shall consider any evidence relevant to 48 public safety, including, but not limited to, all of the 49 following: 50 (a)âThe underlying offense. 51 (b)âAn inmateâs criminal history record. 52 (c)âAn inmateâs disciplinary record while incarcerated. 53 (d)âIndications of rehabilitation. 54 (e)âAn inmateâs physical and mental health, including his 55 or her mobility. 56 (f)âAn inmateâs prospects and support system upon release. 57 58 The commission may also consider the continued cost to the 59 department to house the inmate; however, no such consideration 60 can outweigh public safety threats. 61 (5)âThe authority to determine whether to grant conditional 62 geriatric release and establish additional conditions of 63 conditional geriatric release rests solely within the discretion 64 of the commission, in accordance with this section. 65 (6)âThe conditional geriatric release term of an inmate 66 released under this section is for the remainder of the inmateâs 67 sentence, without diminution of sentence for good behavior. 68 (7)âConditional geriatric release may be revoked in 69 accordance with s. 947.141 for a violation of any condition of 70 the release established by the commission, and the releaseeâs 71 gain-time may be forfeited pursuant to s. 944.28(1). 72 (8)âThe department and the commission shall adopt rules to 73 administer this section. 74 Section 2.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 75 947.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 76 947.13âPowers and duties of commission.â 77 (1)âThe commission shall have the powers and perform the 78 duties of: 79 (h)âDetermining what persons will be released on 80 conditional geriatric release under s. 947.148, conditional 81 medical release under s. 947.149, establishing the conditions of 82 conditional geriatric release or conditional medical release, 83 and determining whether a person has violated the conditions of 84 conditional geriatric release or conditional medical release and 85 taking action with respect to such a violation. 86 Section 3.âSection 947.141, Florida Statutes, is amended to 87 read: 88 947.141âViolations of conditional release, control release, 89 conditional geriatric release, or conditional medical release or 90 addiction-recovery supervision.â 91 (1)âIf a member of the commission or a duly authorized 92 representative of the commission has reasonable grounds to 93 believe that an offender who is on release supervision under s. 94 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731 has 95 violated the terms and conditions of the release in a material 96 respect, such member or representative may cause a warrant to be 97 issued for the arrest of the releasee; if the offender was found 98 to be a sexual predator, the warrant must be issued. 99 (2)âUpon the arrest on a felony charge of an offender who 100 is on release supervision under s. 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 101 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731, the offender must be 102 detained without bond until the initial appearance of the 103 offender at which a judicial determination of probable cause is 104 made. If the trial court judge determines that there was no 105 probable cause for the arrest, the offender may be released. If 106 the trial court judge determines that there was probable cause 107 for the arrest, such determination also constitutes reasonable 108 grounds to believe that the offender violated the conditions of 109 the release. Within 24 hours after the trial court judgeâs 110 finding of probable cause, the detention facility administrator 111 or designee shall notify the commission and the department of 112 the finding and transmit to each a facsimile copy of the 113 probable cause affidavit or the sworn offense report upon which 114 the trial court judgeâs probable cause determination is based. 115 The offender must continue to be detained without bond for a 116 period not exceeding 72 hours excluding weekends and holidays 117 after the date of the probable cause determination, pending a 118 decision by the commission whether to issue a warrant charging 119 the offender with violation of the conditions of release. Upon 120 the issuance of the commissionâs warrant, the offender must 121 continue to be held in custody pending a revocation hearing held 122 in accordance with this section. 123 (3)âWithin 45 days after notice to the Florida Commission 124 on Offender Review of the arrest of a releasee charged with a 125 violation of the terms and conditions of conditional release, 126 control release, conditional geriatric release, conditional 127 medical release, or addiction-recovery supervision, the releasee 128 must be afforded a hearing conducted by a commissioner or a duly 129 authorized representative thereof. If the releasee elects to 130 proceed with a hearing, the releasee must be informed orally and 131 in writing of the following: 132 (a)âThe alleged violation with which the releasee is 133 charged. 134 (b)âThe releaseeâs right to be represented by counsel. 135 (c)âThe releaseeâs right to be heard in person. 136 (d)âThe releaseeâs right to secure, present, and compel the 137 attendance of witnesses relevant to the proceeding. 138 (e)âThe releaseeâs right to produce documents on the 139 releaseeâs own behalf. 140 (f)âThe releaseeâs right of access to all evidence used 141 against the releasee and to confront and cross-examine adverse 142 witnesses. 143 (g)âThe releaseeâs right to waive the hearing. 144 (4)âWithin a reasonable time following the hearing, the 145 commissioner or the commissionerâs duly authorized 146 representative who conducted the hearing shall make findings of 147 fact in regard to the alleged violation. A panel of no fewer 148 than two commissioners shall enter an order determining whether 149 the charge of violation of conditional release, control release, 150 conditional geriatric release, conditional medical release, or 151 addiction-recovery supervision has been sustained based upon the 152 findings of fact presented by the hearing commissioner or 153 authorized representative. By such order, the panel may revoke 154 conditional release, control release, conditional geriatric 155 release, conditional medical release, or addiction-recovery 156 supervision and thereby return the releasee to prison to serve 157 the sentence imposed, reinstate the original order granting the 158 release, or enter such other order as it considers proper. 159 Effective for inmates whose offenses were committed on or after 160 July 1, 1995, the panel may order the placement of a releasee, 161 upon a finding of violation pursuant to this subsection, into a 162 local detention facility as a condition of supervision. 163 (5)âEffective for inmates whose offenses were committed on 164 or after July 1, 1995, notwithstanding the provisions of ss. 165 775.08, former 921.001, 921.002, 921.187, 921.188, 944.02, and 166 951.23, or any other law to the contrary, by such order as 167 provided in subsection (4), the panel, upon a finding of guilt, 168 may, as a condition of continued supervision, place the releasee 169 in a local detention facility for a period of incarceration not 170 to exceed 22 months. Prior to the expiration of the term of 171 incarceration, or upon recommendation of the chief correctional 172 officer of that county, the commission shall cause inquiry into 173 the inmateâs release plan and custody status in the detention 174 facility and consider whether to restore the inmate to 175 supervision, modify the conditions of supervision, or enter an 176 order of revocation, thereby causing the return of the inmate to 177 prison to serve the sentence imposed. The provisions of this 178 section do not prohibit the panel from entering such other order 179 or conducting any investigation that it deems proper. The 180 commission may only place a person in a local detention facility 181 pursuant to this section if there is a contractual agreement 182 between the chief correctional officer of that county and the 183 Department of Corrections. The agreement must provide for a per 184 diem reimbursement for each person placed under this section, 185 which is payable by the Department of Corrections for the 186 duration of the offenderâs placement in the facility. This 187 section does not limit the commissionâs ability to place a 188 person in a local detention facility for less than 1 year. 189 (6)âWhenever a conditional release, control release, 190 conditional geriatric release, conditional medical release, or 191 addiction-recovery supervision is revoked by a panel of no fewer 192 than two commissioners and the releasee is ordered to be 193 returned to prison, the releasee, by reason of the misconduct, 194 shall be deemed to have forfeited all gain-time or commutation 195 of time for good conduct, as provided for by law, earned up to 196 the date of release. However, if a conditional medical release 197 is revoked due to the improved medical or physical condition of 198 the releasee, the releasee shall not forfeit gain-time accrued 199 before the date of conditional medical release. This subsection 200 does not deprive the prisoner of the right to gain-time or 201 commutation of time for good conduct, as provided by law, from 202 the date of return to prison. 203 (7)âIf a law enforcement officer has probable cause to 204 believe that an offender who is on release supervision under s. 205 947.1405, s. 947.146, s. 947.148, s. 947.149, or s. 944.4731 has 206 violated the terms and conditions of his or her release by 207 committing a felony offense, the officer shall arrest the 208 offender without a warrant, and a warrant need not be issued in 209 the case. 210 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.